Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.070

Probation officers—Powers and duties.

The probation officer in every county shall give such assistance to the family court as may be requested to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to that end the probation officer shall, upon request, make investigations and reports as requested, and in cases pursuant to this chapter shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties granted or imposed by the laws of this state relating to probation or to probation officers.

[ 1949 c 50 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-36.]

NOTES:

Indeterminate sentences: Chapter 9.95 RCW.

Probation officers—Appointment—Powers—Compensation: RCW 13.04.040.